Washington statutes.
RCW 4.32.170

Answer may be stricken.

Sham, frivolous and irrelevant answers and defenses may be stricken out on motion, and upon such terms as the court may in its discretion impose.

[Code 1881 s 85; 1877 p 19 s 85; 1869 p 21 s 83; 1854 p 140 s 47; RRS s 275.]